Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-7] Federal approval.
The department shall seek waivers and any additional approvals from the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services that may be necessary to implement the
hospital sustainability program. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c
141, pt of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L 2015, c 70, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next